src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Inari Saami numerals

LEXICON Numeral !!≈ * **@CODE@**

HUNDREDSM ;         ! 200M
čyeti HUNDREDM ;    ! 100M
TENSM ;             ! 20-99M
TEENSM ;            ! 10-19M
ONESM ;             ! 1-9M
HUNDREDST ;         ! 200000-999999
HUNDREDST ;         ! 200000-999999
čyeti  HUNDREDT ;   ! 100000-100999
TENST ;             ! 20000-99999,10000-10999
TEENST ;            ! 11000-19999
ONEST ;             ! 2000-9999
tuhháát  THOUSAND ; ! 1000-1999
UNDERTHOUSAND ;     ! 100-999
TENS ;              ! 20-99
TEENS ;             ! 10-19
ONES ;              ! 1-9

num-imprecise ;         ! kalle, ...
MISCNUM ;           ! pelnub
ARABICS          ; ! for the arabic numerals !
ROMAN           ; ! for the roman numerals  !
NUM-PREFIXES    ; ! for §34 etc.            !
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                      !
LOHKAI ;


LEXICON HUNDREDSM   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyehti CUODIM ;
kulmâ  CUODIM ;
nelji  CUODIM ;
vittâ  CUODIM ;
kuttâ  CUODIM ;
čiččâm CUODIM ;
käävci CUODIM ;
oovce  CUODIM ;

LEXICON CUODIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeti HUNDREDM ;

LEXICON HUNDREDM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 TENSM ;
 TEENSM ;
 ONESM ;
 MILJON ;

LEXICON TEENSM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 TEENM ;

LEXICON TEENM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  LOHKAIM ;
kyehti  LOHKAIM ;
kulmâ  LOHKAIM ;
nelji  LOHKAIM ;
vittâ+Use/NG:vittâ  LOHKAIM ;
kuttâ+Use/NG:kuttâ  LOHKAIM ;
vitt  LOHKAIM ;
kutt  LOHKAIM ;
čiččâm  LOHKAIM ;
käävci  LOHKAIM ;
oovce  LOHKAIM ;

LEXICON LOHKAIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubáloh MILJON ;

LEXICON TENSM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  MILJON ;
kyehti  LOGIM ;
kulmâ  LOGIM ;
nelji  LOGIM ;
vittâ  LOGIM ;
kuttâ  LOGIM ;
čiččâm  LOGIM ;
käävci  LOGIM ;
oovce  LOGIM ;

LEXICON LOGIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  MILJON ;
love ONESM ;

LEXICON ONESM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
miljon%   OVERTHOUSANDS ;
kyehti  MILJON ;
kulmâ  MILJON ;
nelji  MILJON ;
vittâ  MILJON ;
kuttâ  MILJON ;
čiččâm  MILJON ;
käävci  MILJON ;
oovce  MILJON ; 

LEXICON MILJON  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
% miljona%  OVERTHOUSANDS ;

! =================
!! # Under the million
! =================

!! In principle as the above.

LEXICON OVERTHOUSANDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
HUNDREDST ;		! x00.000.000
čyeđe  HUNDREDT ;	! 100.000.000
  TENST ;		!  20.000.000
  TEENST ;		!  10.000.000
  TWOST ;		!   2.000.000
  SEVENST ;		!   7.000.000
tuhháát THOUSAND ;	!   1.000.000
 UNDERTHOUSAND ;	
  TENS ;
  TEENS ;
  ONES ;
  num ;	!  x000000


LEXICON HUNDREDST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyehti   TWOCUODIT ;	! 200000-299999
kulmâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 300000-399999
nelji  TWOCUODIT ;	! 400000-499999
vittâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 500000-599999
kuttâ  TWOCUODIT ;	! 600000-699999
čiččâm  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 700000-799999
käävci  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 800000-899999
oovce  SEVENCUODIT ;	! 900000-999999

LEXICON TWOCUODIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeđe  HUNDREDT ;	! 100000-199999

LEXICON SEVENCUODIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čyeđe HUNDREDT ;

LEXICON HUNDREDT	 !!≈ * **@CODE@**  X = 1-9, Y = 0-9
TENST ;			! X2XYYY, X10YYY
TEENST ;		! X1XYYY
ohtâ:oht^RVâ TWOTHOUSANDS ; ! Same tuhháát as 2000
  ONEST ;		! XX0YYY
 THOUSANDS ;	! X00YYY

LEXICON TEENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  TEENT ;

LEXICON TEENT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
love  THOUSANDS ;
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  LOHKAIT ;
kyehti  LOHKAIT ;
kulmâ  LOHKAIT ;
nelji  LOHKAIT ;
vitt  LOHKAIT ;
vittâ+Use/NG:vittâ  LOHKAIT ;
kutt  LOHKAIT ;
kuttâ+Use/NG:kuttâ  LOHKAIT ;
čiččâm  LOHKAIT ;
käävci  LOHKAIT ;
oovce  LOHKAIT ;

LEXICON LOHKAIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
nubáloh THOUSANDS ;

LEXICON TENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
muádlov:muád#lov  LOGIT ;
maŋgâlov:maŋgâ#lov LOGIT ;
muáddilov+Use/NG:muáddi#lov  LOGIT ;
kyehtlov:kyeht#lov  LOGIT ;
kulmâlov:kulmâ#lov  LOGIT ;
kulmlov+Use/NG:kulm#lov  LOGIT ;
neljilov:nelji#lov  LOGIT ;
vittlov:vitt#lov  LOGIT ;
vittlov+Use/NG:vittâ#lov  LOGIT ;
kuttlov:kutt#lov  LOGIT ;
čiččâmlov:čiččâm#lov  LOGIT ;
kähcilov:kähci#lov  LOGIT ;
ohcelov:ohce#lov  LOGIT ;

LEXICON LOGIT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  THOUSANDS ;
ohtâ:oht^RVâ  THOUSANDS ;
ONEST ;

LEXICON ONEST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
TWOST ;			! 2000-6999
SEVENST ;               ! 7000-9999

LEXICON THOUSANDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
tuhháát  THOUSAND ;    ! 1000-1999

LEXICON TWOST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kyeht  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
kulmâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
nelji  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
vittâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;
kuttâ  TWOTHOUSANDS ;

LEXICON SEVENST !!≈ * **@CODE@**
čiččâm  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;
käävci  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;
oovce  SEVENTHOUSANDS ;

LEXICON TWOTHOUSANDS       !!≈ * **@CODE@** 2000 - 6999
tuhháát THOUSAND ;

LEXICON SEVENTHOUSANDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 7000 - 9999
tuhháát THOUSAND ;


LEXICON THOUSAND !!≈ * **@CODE@**
UNDERTHOUSAND ;	   ! 1100-1999
  TENS ;	   ! 1020-1099
  TEENS ;	   ! 1010-1019
  ONES ;	   ! 1001-1009
+Num:  X_POTTAAK ;	   ! 1000

!===========================
!! # Here starts the 999 numbers
!===========================

LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND !!≈ * **@CODE@**
SEVENHUNDREDS ;
TWOHUNDREDS ;
čyeti:čyet^RCi3  HUNDRED ;
čyeti+Use/NG+Num+Sg+Gen:čyet  K ;


LEXICON SEVENHUNDREDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 700-900 with +Par
čiččâm  SEVENCUODI ;
käävci  SEVENCUODI ;
ohce  SEVENCUODI ;

LEXICON TWOHUNDREDS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 200-699 with +Acc
kyehti  CUODI ;
oht+Use/NG:oht  CUODI ;
kyeht+Use/NG:kyeht  CUODI ;
kulmâ  CUODI ;
kulm+Use/NG:kulm  CUODI ;
nelji  CUODI ;
vittâ  CUODI ;
vitt+Use/NG:vitt  CUODI ;
vit+Use/NG:vit  CUODI ;
kuttâ  CUODI ;
kutt+Use/NG:kutt  CUODI ;
kut+Use/NG:kut  CUODI ;
käävc+Use/NG:käävc  CUODI ;
kävc+Use/NG:kävc  CUODI ;

LEXICON SEVENCUODI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 700-900 with +Par
čyeđe HUNDRED ;
čyet HUNDRED ;

LEXICON CUODI  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 200-699 with +Acc
čyeđe HUNDRED ;
čyet HUNDRED ;

LEXICON HUNDRED  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 TENS ;
 TEENS ;
 ONES ;
 CYETI ;

LEXICON TEENS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  TEEN ;
